Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB196.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 278.610 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Public Service Commission may certify a nuclear power facility if it finds that
the facility and plan for storage of the facility's high-level nuclear waste have been
approved by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission.
(2) The commission may[shall have the authority to] hire a consultant to perform duties
relating to this section. Any expenses or fees incurred by the commission in hiring a
consultant shall be borne by the applicant.
(3) The construction of low-level nuclear waste disposal sites in the Commonwealth
shall be prohibited, except as provided in KRS 211.852.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:00 AM Jacketed